Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.050

Board—Generally.

Members of the board shall be residents of this state. All administrator members of the board shall be holders of licenses under this chapter. The terms of all members shall be five years. Any board member may be removed for just cause including a finding of fact of unprofessional conduct or impaired practice. The governor may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term. No board member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Board members shall serve until their successors are appointed. Board members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. The board may elect annually a chair and vice chair to direct the meetings of the board. The board shall meet at least four times each year and may hold additional meetings as called by the secretary or the chair. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 4; 1992 c 53 s 5; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 5.]